Montana, session 2025, HB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 19-20-621, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-20-621. Montana university system retirement program supplemental contributions. (1)
Each employer within the university system with employees participating in the university system retirement
program under Title 19, chapter 21, shall contribute to the teachers' retirement system a supplemental
employer contribution sufficient to amortize, by July 1, 2033, the past service liability of the teachers' retirement
system for the university system members.
(2) The university system retirement program supplemental employer contribution as a percentage
of the total compensation of all employees participating in the program is: 14.21%.
(a) 4.04% beginning July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2007; and
(b) 4.72% beginning July 1, 2007.
(3) The board shall periodically review the supplemental employer contribution rate and
recommend adjustments to the legislature as needed to maintain the amortization of the university system's
past service liability by July 1, 2033."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 51